Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Use of State-Owned Vehicles.

Sec. 44.68.010.
Authorized uses.

State-owned vehicles may be used only in the conduct of state business.
A state officer or employee may not use or permit the use of a state-owned vehicle except in the conduct of state business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.68.020.
Regulations.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall adopt regulations that

define what is the use of state-owned automotive and mechanical vehicles in the conduct of state business and distinguish this use from misappropriation for private use;

prescribe use governing the storage of state-owned vehicles in those locations where storage space, under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, is available for storage of state-owned vehicles;

provide for the marking of state-owned vehicles as property of the state and for the use of distinctive license tags for state-owned vehicles.

History.

(§ 2 ch 178 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1960; am § 50 ch 127 SLA 1974; am E.O. No. 39, § 11 (1977))

Sec. 44.68.030.
Exemptions.

AS

44.68.010

—

44.68.040

do not apply to the use of vehicles by the governor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 178 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.68.040.
Violations.

A state officer or employee who violates AS

44.68.010

—

44.68.040

or a regulation adopted under AS

44.68.010

—

44.68.040

is subject to dismissal from state employment upon hearing as provided for other dismissals for cause.

History.

(§ 4 ch 178 SLA 1959)